District of Columbia statutes.
7-3013

Program evaluation.

APRA shall review the success of the Program and perform a comprehensive evaluation of all APRA substance abuse treatment programs and submit its report to the Council by January 15, 2003.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 14, 47 DCR 4350